Missouri, session 2026, HB2760.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.810, to read as follows:
1.810. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Protecting
Religious Assembly in States of Emergency (PRAISE) Act".
2. During states of emergency declared under the provisions of chapter 44 or
orders made with the powers granted under section 192.020, neither the state nor any of
its political subdivisions shall impose restrictions upon religious places of worship with
the intent to make, or the effect of making, religious services impractical. If any entity is
exempt from such emergency declarations or orders, religious places of worship shall
also be exempt. Emergency declarations and orders shall not prohibit religious services
that are held on private property.
3. The provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall not apply to emergency
evacuation orders involving imminent danger from flooding, fires, tornadoes,
earthquakes, terrorist threats, civil unrest, or hazardous material incidents that apply
generally to the area where the religious place of worship or the residences of its
members are located. Once the imminent danger has passed, religious services shall be
allowed to resume.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2760 2
4. If the state or any of its political subdivisions violate this section, the religious
place or places of worship affected may bring a civil action for relief in a court of
competent jurisdiction. Relief sought may include, but shall not be limited to, injunctive
orders, compensatory damages, nominal damages, declaration of violation, and where
malice or recklessness is demonstrated, punitive damages.
✔